New York, session 2025-2026, S6465.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (b) of section 24-241 of the administrative 2 code of the city of New York, as added by local law number 113 of the 3 city of New York for the year 2005, is amended to read as follows: 4 (b) No person shall operate or permit to be operated an emergency 5 signal device installed on an authorized emergency vehicle [that when] 6 unless: 7 1. When operated at the maximum level such emergency signal device 8 creates a sound level [in excess of] that does not exceed 90 dB(A) when 9 measured at a distance of fifty feet from the center of the forward face 10 of such vehicle[.]; and 11 2. Such emergency signal device produces an alternating high and low, 12 two-toned sound in accordance with implementation standards established 13 by the department. 14 (c) Within one year after the effective date of this subdivision and 15 every two years thereafter, emergency signal devices installed on 16 authorized emergency vehicles shall be tested and certification shall be 17 submitted, in a form approved by the department, that such devices meet 18 the [standard] standards set forth in [this] subdivision (b) of this 19 section for operation at maximum level and with an alternating high and 20 low two-toned sound. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, where 21 compliance with the provisions of [this] subdivision (b) of this section 22 would create an undue hardship, the owner or operator of an authorized 23 emergency vehicle may submit a plan to the commissioner for emergency 24 signal devices to meet the [standard] standards set forth in [this] EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04216-01-5 S. 6465 2 1 subdivision (b) of this section within two years after the effective 2 date of this subdivision. Such plan shall be submitted within one year 3 after the effective date of this subdivision in lieu of the required 4 certification. [This subdivision shall not apply to authorized emergency 5 vehicles of the police department, fire department or authorized emer- 6 gency vehicles responding to medical emergencies.] 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 8 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 9 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 10 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 11 completed on or before such effective date.